Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 26. Uniform Trade Secrets Act.

§ 59.1-336.
Short title and definitions.

As used in this chapter, which may be cited as the Uniform Trade Secrets Act, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Improper means” includes theft, bribery, misrepresentation, use of a computer or computer network without authority, breach of a duty or inducement of a breach of a duty to maintain secrecy, or espionage through electronic or other means.

“Misappropriation” means:

Acquisition of a trade secret of another by a person who knows or has reason to know that the trade secret was acquired by improper means; or

Disclosure or use of a trade secret of another without express or implied consent by a person who

Used improper means to acquire knowledge of the trade secret; or

At the time of disclosure or use, knew or had reason to know that his knowledge of the trade secret was

Derived from or through a person who had utilized improper means to acquire it;

Acquired under circumstances giving rise to a duty to maintain its secrecy or limit its use;

Derived from or through a person who owed a duty to the person seeking relief to maintain its secrecy or limit its use; or

Acquired by accident or mistake.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Trade secret” means information, including but not limited to, a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process, that:

1.
Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by, other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use,
and

2.
Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

History.
1986, c. 210; 2009, cc. 321, 376.

Cross references.

As to records which are excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §§

2.2-3705.2

,

2.2-3705.6

,

2.2-3705.7

.

As to the limited purposes for which “public bodies,” as defined by the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, may hold closed meetings, see §

2.2-3711

.

As to the penalties established under this act applying to agreements for the release of confidential information under the Virginia Biotechnology Research Act, see §

2.2-5506

.

Uniform law cross references.

For other signatory state provisions, see:

Alabama: Code of Ala. §§ 8-27-1 to 8-27-6.

Alaska: Alaska Stat. §§ 45.50.910 to 45.50.945.

Arizona: A.R.S. §§ 44-401 to 44-407.

California: California Civ. Code §§ 3426 to 3426.11.

Colorado: C.R.S §§ 7-74-101 to 7-74-110.

Connecticut: Conn. Gen. Stat. §§ 35-50 to 35-58.

Delaware: 6 Del. C. §§ 2001 to 2009.

District of Columbia: D.C. Code §§ 36-401 to 36-410.

Florida: Fla. Stat. §§ 688.001 to 688.009.

Hawaii: H.R.S. §§ 482B-1 to 482B-9.

Indiana: Burns Ind. Code §§ 24-2-3-1 to 24-2-3-8.

Iowa: Iowa Code §§ 550.1 to 550.8.

Kansas: K.S.A. §§ 60-3320 to 60-3330.

Kentucky: K.R.S. §§ 365.880 to 365.900.

Louisiana: La. R.S. §§ 51:1431 to 51:1439.

Maine: 10 M.R.S. §§ 1541 to 1548.

Maryland: Md. Commercial Code Ann. §§ 11-1201 to 11-1209.

Michigan: M.C.L.S. §§ 445.1901 to 445.1910.

Minnesota: Minn. Stat. §§ 325C.01 to 325C.08.

Mississippi: Miss. Code Ann. §§ 75-26-1 to 75-26-19.

Missouri: §§ 417.450 to 417.467 R.S.Mo.

Montana: Mont. Code Anno. §§ 30-14-401 to 30-14-409.

Nevada: Nev. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 600A.010 to 600A.100.

New Hampshire: R.S.A. §§ 350-B:1 to 350-B:9.

New Mexico: N.M. Stat. Ann. §§

57-3

A-1 to

57-3

A-7.

North Dakota: N.D. Cent. Code §§ 47-25.1-01 to 47-25.1-08.

Ohio: O.R.C. Ann. §§ 1333.61 to 1333.69.

Oklahoma: 78 Okl. St. §§ 85 to 94.

Oregon: O.R.S. § 646.461 et seq.

Pennsylvania: 12 Pa. C.S. §§ 5301 to 5308.

Rhode Island: R.I. Gen. Laws §§ 6-41-1 to 6-41-11.

South Dakota S.D. Codified Laws §§ 37-29-1 to 37-29-11.

Tennessee: Tenn. Code Ann. §§ 47-25-1701 to 47-25-1709.

Texas: Tex. Civ. Prac. & Rem. Code § 134A.001 et seq.

Utah: Utah Code Ann. §§ 13-24-1 to 13-24-9.

Virgin Islands: 11 V.I.C. §§ 1001 to 1010.

Washington: Rev. Code Wash. §§ 19.108.010 to 19.108.940.

West Virginia: W. Va. Code §§ 47-22-1 to 47-22-10.

Wisconsin: Wis. Stat. § 134.90.

Wyoming: Wyo. Stat. §§ 40-24-101 to 40-24-110.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 321 and 376 are identical, and inserted “use of a computer or computer network without authority” in the paragraph defining “Improper means.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Myth, Chameleon or Intellectual Property Olympian? A Normative Framework Supporting Trade Secret Law,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 69 (1999).

For article, “The Virginia Uniform Trade Secrets Act: A Critical Summary of the Act and Case Law,” see 5 Va. J.L. & Tech. 15 (Fall 2000).

For article, “Antitrust and Trade Regulation,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 453 (2001).

For note, “Inevitable Disclosure Through an Internet Lens: Is the Doctrine’s Demise Truly Inevitable,” see 45 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 395 (2003).

For article, “Contributory Negligence, Technology, and Trade Secrets,” see 17 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 1 (2009).

For note, “Causing Damage Without Authorization: The Limitations of Current Judicial Interpretations of Employee Authorization Under the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act,” 52 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 1369 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 201 (2012).

For article, “The Case Against Federalizing Trade Secrets,” see 101 Va. L. Rev. 317 (2015).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 29 Consumer Actions and Products Liability. § 29.03 Statutory Consumer Actions. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 13-523 Confidential Information.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
4A M.J. Conspiracy, § 13; 6A M.J. Discovery, § 35; 18 M.J. Trademarks, Trade Names and Unfair Competition, § 4.1.

§ 59.1-337.
Injunctive relief.

Actual or threatened misappropriation may be enjoined. Upon application to the court, an injunction shall be terminated when the trade secret has ceased to exist, but the injunction may be continued for an additional reasonable period of time in order
to eliminate commercial advantage that otherwise would be derived from the misappropriation.

In exceptional circumstances, an injunction may condition future use upon payment of a reasonable royalty for no longer than the period of time for which use could have been prohibited. Exceptional circumstances include, but are not limited to, a material
and prejudicial change of position prior to acquiring knowledge or reason to know of misappropriation that renders a prohibitive injunction inequitable.

In appropriate circumstances, affirmative acts to protect a trade secret may be compelled by court order.

History.
1986, c. 210.

Law Review.

For article, “Antitrust and Trade Regulation,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 453 (2001).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
10A M.J. Injunctions, §§ 113, 161.

§ 59.1-338.
Damages.

Except where the user of a misappropriated trade secret has made a material and prejudicial change in his position prior to having either knowledge or reason to know of the misappropriation and the court determines that a monetary recovery would be inequitable,
a complainant is entitled to recover damages for misappropriation. Damages can include both the actual loss caused by misappropriation and the unjust enrichment caused by misappropriation that is not taken into account in computing
actual loss. If a complainant is unable to prove a greater amount of damages by other methods of measurement, the damages caused by misappropriation can be measured exclusively by imposition of liability for a reasonable royalty
for a misappropriator’s unauthorized disclosure or use of a trade secret.

If willful and malicious misappropriation exists, the court may award punitive damages in an amount not exceeding twice any award made under subsection A of this section, or $350,000 whichever amount is less.

History.
1986, c. 210; 1990, c. 344.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia labor and employment law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (2005).

§ 59.1-338.1.
Attorneys’ fees.

If the court determines that (i) a claim of misappropriation is made in bad faith, or (ii) willful and malicious misappropriation exists, the court may award reasonable attorneys’ fees to the prevailing party.

History.
1990, c. 344.

§ 59.1-339.
Preservation of secrecy.

In an action under this chapter, a court shall preserve the secrecy of an alleged trade secret by reasonable means, which may include:

Granting protective orders in connection with discovery proceedings;

Holding in-camera hearings;

Sealing the records of the action; and

Ordering any person involved in the litigation not to disclose an alleged trade secret without prior court approval.

History.
1986, c. 210.

§ 59.1-340.
Statute of limitations.

An action for misappropriation shall be brought within three years after the misappropriation is discovered or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have been discovered. For the purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation constitutes
a single claim.

History.
1986, c. 210.

Law Review.

For article, “The Case Against Federalizing Trade Secrets,” see 101 Va. L. Rev. 317 (2015).

§ 59.1-341.
Effect on other law.

Except as provided in subsection B of this section, this chapter displaces conflicting tort, restitutionary, and other law of this Commonwealth providing civil remedies for misappropriation of a trade secret.

This chapter does not affect:

Contractual remedies whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret; or

Other civil remedies that are not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret; or

Criminal remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret.

History.
1986, c. 210.

§ 59.1-342.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 59.1-342, pertaining to severability, derived from 1986, c. 210.

§ 59.1-343.
Time of taking effect.

This chapter shall become effective on July 1, 1986, and shall not apply to misappropriation occurring prior to the effective date. With respect to a continuing misappropriation that began prior to the effective date, the chapter also shall not apply
to misappropriation that occurs after the effective date.

History.
1986, c. 210.